Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 29. Public Property and Supplies
Executive Order No. 29-46
(No. 11-10) [Transfer of Properties between the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

WHEREAS, certain state-owned land (the “Property”) located in the Town of Victory, County of Essex and State of Vermont, described more particularly below, presently is under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department
of Fish and Wildlife; and

WHEREAS, the Property was purchased solely with Department of Fish and Wildlife funds; and

WHEREAS, the Property is completely surrounded by Victory State Forest; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Fish and Wildlife has determined that the Property would be more efficiently managed as part of Victory State Forest by the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation desires to incorporate the Property into Victory State Forest and to hold, control and manage the Property consistent with

10 V.S.A. § 6301
; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation is committed to managing the property for the purposes of a State Forest.

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the above purposes, jurisdiction and
control of the following state-owned land:

A portion of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by New England Power Company, by their Quit Claim Deed dated November 12, 1969, which is recorded in the land records of the Town of Victory at Book 17, Page 190. The portion to
be transferred is more particularly described as:

“Lot No. 4 in the 9th Range”

The parcel of land conveyed hereby is approximately 144.5 +/- acres and is surrounded by land owned by the State of Vermont and managed as Victory State Forest.

Excluded from this executive order are the remaining parcels contained in the conveyance from New England Power Company to the State of Vermont in the above referenced Quit Claim Deed. These lots will remain under management of the Department of Fish
and Wildlife as part of Victory Basin Wildlife Management Area.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated November 29, 2010.

Executive Order No. 29-47
(No. 12-10) [Transfer of Properties between the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

WHEREAS, certain state-owned land (the “Property”) located in the Town of Victory, County of Essex and State of Vermont, described more particularly below, presently is under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department
of Forests, Parks and Recreation; and

WHEREAS, the Property is adjacent to or surrounded by Victory Basin Wildlife Management Area; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation has determined that the Property would be more efficiently managed as part of Victory Basin Wildlife Management Area by the Department of Fish and Wildlife; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Fish and Wildlife desires to incorporate the Property into Victory Basin Wildlife Management Area and to own, control and manage the Property for wildlife habitat consistent with 10 V.S.A. ch. 103; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Fish and Wildlife is committed to managing the property for the purposes for which the property was acquired and manage as a Wildlife Management Area.

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the State of Vermont, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the State of Vermont, Department of Fish and Wildlife, for
the above purposes, ownership and control of the following state-owned land:

A portion of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by

THE TRUST FOR PUBLIC LAND,
d/b/a The Trust for Public Land, Inc., by their Warranty Deed dated September 9, 2005, which is recorded in the land records of the Town of Victory at Book 21, Page 525-532. The portion to be transferred is more particularly
described as follows:

A 76+/- acre parcel located in Lots 5 & 6 Range 11; also known as the “Bog Brook ” Lot

An 80+/- acre parcel located in Lot 6 Range 14; also known as the “Lee’s Hill ” Lot

A 270+/- acre parcel located in Lot 6 Range 16, in Lot 7 Ranges 15, 16 and 17 and in Lot 8 Ranges 15 and 16; also known as the “Hay’s Hill Brook ” Lot

An 81+/- acre parcel located in Lot 10 Range 15 and in Lot 9 Range 15

The parcels of land conveyed hereby are approximately 507 +/- acres.

Excluded from this executive order are 7 +/- acres in two parcels located in Lot 5 Range 18; also known as the “Powerline Twins”, contained in the conveyance from the Trust for Public Land to the State of Vermont. These parcels will remain under the management
of the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation as part of Victory State Forest.

This executive order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated November 29, 2010.

Executive Order No. 29-48
(No. 13-10) [Transfer of Properties between the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

WHEREAS, certain state-owned land (the “Property”) located in the Town of Victory, County of Essex and State of Vermont, described more particularly below, presently is under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department
of Forests, Parks and Recreation; and

WHEREAS, the Property was purchased with funds from the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board, for the purposes of conservation and sustainable management of forests resources, management of wildlife habitat and dispersed, pedestrian public access; and

WHEREAS, the Property is subject to a Grant of Development Rights and Conservation Restrictions held by the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board that authorized the purchase of the Property by the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation consistent
with the goals set forth in

10 V.S.A. § 6301
to encourage and assist the maintenance of the present uses of Vermont’s agricultural, forest and other undeveloped land and to preserve and to enhance Vermont’s scenic natural resources; and

WHEREAS, the Property is completely surrounded by Victory Basin Wildlife Management Area; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation has determined that the Property would be more efficiently managed as part of Victory Basin Wildlife Management Area by the Department of Fish and Wildlife; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Fish and Wildlife desires to incorporate the Property into Victory Basin Wildlife Management Area and to own, control and manage the Property for wildlife habitat consistent with 10 V.S.A. ch. 103; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Fish and Wildlife is committed to managing the property consistent with the purposes for which the property was acquired and managed as a Wildlife Management Area.

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the State of Vermont, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the State of Vermont, Department of Fish and Wildlife, for
the above purposes, ownership and control of the following state-owned land:

A portion of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by

THE NATURE CONSERVANCY,
by their Warranty Deed dated September 19, 1995, which is recorded in the land records of the Town of Victory at Book 19, Page 355-359. The portion to be transferred is more particularly described in the above referenced
Warranty Deed as:

“Parcel Two - Victory, Essex County Vermont”

“Lot No. 6 in the 15th Range”

The parcel of land conveyed hereby is approximately 105 +/- acres.

Excluded from this executive order are the following parcels contained in the conveyance from The Nature Conservancy to the State of Vermont.

Lots Nos. 11, 12, and 13 in the 13th Range

Lot No. 11 in the 15th Range

Lot Nos. 5, 10, 11, and 12 in the 14th Range

Lot No. 5 in the 16th Range

Lot Nos. 5 and 6 in the 17th Range

These lots will remain under management of the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation as part of Victory State Forest.

This executive order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated November 29, 2010.

Executive Order No. 29-49
(No. 09-12) [Transfer of Lands and Permanent Buffer Easement in Berkshire and Enosburgh from the Agency of Transportation to the Agency of Natural Resources.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain lands and a permanent buffer easement which comprise the river corridor and riparian buffer zones for the Trout River herein described and located in the Towns of Berkshire and Enosburgh in the State of Vermont, in connection
with the construction of Transportation Project Berkshire BRF RS 0283 (7) (Trout River Restoration), are presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation (VTrans); and

WHEREAS, VTrans has completed the required monitoring conditions under the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers 404 permit for the aforementioned project, and does not consider continued VTrans jurisdiction and control of these lands and permanent buffer easement
to be in the best public interest; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources (ANR) has a goal of maintaining high quality riparian and river habitats, and providing angling opportunities for the public that would best be served by the transfer and control of the lands and permanent buffer
easement from VTrans to ANR;

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife jurisdiction and control of certain lands and
a permanent buffer easement for its purposes, said land and permanent buffer easement being more particularly described as follows:

Being all of the same land and/or permanent buffer easement conveyed to State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation by the following instruments:

Warranty Deed from Raymond G. Kinney and Virginia G. Kinney, dated April 21, 2003, which is recorded in Book 107 page 29 of the Enosburgh land records;

Warranty Deed from Raymond G. Kinney and Virginia G. Kinney, dated April 21, 2003, which is recorded in Book 68 Pages 37-39 of the Berkshire land records;

Warranty Deed of Easement from Daniel F. Kotorman and Holly H. Kotorman, dated April 21, 2003, which is recorded in Book 68, Pages 42 and 43 of the Berkshire land records;

Warranty Deed from L.F. Hurtubise & Sons, Inc., dated April 21, 2003, which is recorded in Book 107, Page 31 of the Enosburgh land records; and being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of Parcels #1E, 1F, 1G and 11 consisting of 15.80 acres, more or less, land, and all of Parcel # 2A consisting of a permanent buffer easement, as shown on right-of-way sheets 23, 25 and 26 of the plans of Transportation Project Berkshire BRF
-RS 0283 (7) as filed on March 13th, 2003, in the offices of the clerks of Enosburgh and Berkshire.

The buffer easement, described as Parcel 2A above, consists of 0.22 acre, more or less, and is located right of and between approximate stations 123+49 and 124+52.71 of the Trout River Restoration baseline of the aforementioned project and includes:

The right to change and maintain the channel of the Trout River including the installation of stone fill along the bank of the river; and

The right to plant and maintain trees in a buffer area above the bank to protect and stabilize the bank. None of the existing landscaping items either within or outside the easement area will be removed without the written permission of VTrans.

ANR agrees to be responsible for and comply with the conditions or agreements which are associated with the lands and permanent buffer easement described above, and contained in the aforementioned deeds to State of Vermont.

This Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated September 12, 2012.

Executive Order No. 29-50
(No. 14-12) [Transfer of Property in St. Johnsbury from Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings & General Services to Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish & Wildlife.

WHEREAS, certain State-owned land. including a building formerly used as the Northeast Regional Library, in St. Johnsbury (“Property”). is presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General
Services (“BGS”); and

WHEREAS, BGS has no further use for the Property; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife (“ANR/DFW”), desires the use of the Property for its purposes: and

WHEREAS, upon execution of the property transfer, ANR/DFW, will be responsible for the maintenance costs, security, heating costs, electrical costs, snow removal, grounds maintenance, overall conditions. Payments in Lieu of Taxes, State historic preservation
requirements and all other costs associated with the administration, ownership and management of the Property:

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by the power vested in me as Governor, do transfer and set over to ANR/DFW, for its purposes, from BGS, the following described land and premises, to wit:

The lands and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by warranty deed of Gilbert D. Johnson and Betty B. Johnson on September 15, 1967, which is recorded in the St. Johnsbury land records at Book 131, Pages 15-17, and more fully described therein as:

Beginning at an iron pipe located at the junction of the northwest corner of Town Highway #62 and U.S. Route 2; thence S 45° 27´ W 46.23 feet to a point; thence S 20° 03´ W 88.87 feet to a point; thence S 13° 23´ W 114.87 feet to an iron pipe; thence
N 60° 02´ W 169.79 feet to a railroad rail located on the east side of town highway #61 (the Pumpkin Hill Road, so-called); thence N 27° 31´ E 293.06 feet to an iron pipe on the southwest side of U.S. Route 2; thence S 54° 25´ E 270.25
feet to a point; thence S 45° 16´ E 95.08 feet to the point of beginning.

This Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated December 28, 2012.

Executive Order No. 29-51
(No. 08-13) [Transfer of Certain Land and Permanent Easements in the Town of Swanton from the Agency of Natural Resources to the Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation (“VTRANS”) has constructed Transportation Project Alburgh-Swanton BRF 036-1(1), which involved the replacement of the bridge carrying a state highway known as Vermont Route 78 over Lake Champlain’s Missisquoi Bay,
and which affected land under the jurisdiction of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife (“ANR”); and

WHEREAS, VTRANS and ANR desire to complete the transfer of the necessary exchange of land and/or rights and easements from ANR to VTRANS, as set forth in a Memorandum of Agreement between VTRANS and ANR dated December 11, 2003.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to VTRANS jurisdiction and control of certain land and permanent easements over land of ANR for its purpose, said
land and permanent easements being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont, acting through its Department of Fish and Game of the Agency of Environmental Conservation by Warranty Deed of John A. Carman and Erma H. Carman, dated October 20, 1976, which
is recorded in Book 89, Pages 230-232 of the Town of Swanton land records and is more particularly described as:

Being Parcel #15 consisting of 0.12 hectare (0.30 acre), more or less, land and rights therein, as shown on right-of-way sheets 27, 35, 36, and 37 of the plans of Transportation Project Alburgh-Swanton BRF 036-1(1) (“the Transportation Project”) and filed
on February 7, 2003, in the office of the clerk of the Town of Swanton.

In connection with the above parcel the following easement and/or rights are conveyed:

Permanent easements to discharge water on land of ANR as such water may hereafter be discharged or flow at or near and left of approximate stations 12+305.0 and 12+667.5 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

A permanent easement in an area of 0.15 hectare (0.37 acre), more or less, and located left of and between approximate stations 12+535.1 and 12+764.0 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project; to install, construct, reconstruct, operate,
repair, maintain, replace, patrol and remove overhead or underground cable, lines, conduits, poles, guys, anchors, braces, fixtures, and appurtenances thereto, hereinafter referred to as facilities, as necessary for the transmission
of power and telecommunications under, upon, or across land of ANR. This easement also includes the perpetual right to cut, trim, and remove all trees, shrubs, bushes, underbrush, and other items, as determined necessary by VTRANS,
for the safe and efficient operation and maintenance of the facilities. ANR and its successors and assigns will not, without the prior written permission of VTRANS, erect or permit the erection of any building or any other structure,
plant or permit the growth of any trees or bushes, change the grade or permit the change of grade, or fill or excavate within this easement area which will adversely affect the maintenance and operation by VTRANS, its successors and
assigns.

Permanent easements to install and maintain guy wire at or near and left of approximate stations 12+545.9 and 12+763.7 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

This Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated October 2, 2013.

Executive Order No. 29-52
(No. 04-15) [Transfer of Property in Duxbury from Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services to Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

WHEREAS, certain State-owned land located in the Town of Duxbury, County of Washington, State of Vermont, westerly of Vermont State Route 100B, consisting of 32.3 acres and known as the “Father Logue’s Camp” parcel is presently under the jurisdiction
and control of the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services (“BGS”);

WHEREAS, an adjacent parcel of State-owned land located in the Town of Duxbury, County of Washington, State of Vermont, westerly of Vermont State Route 100B and consisting of 137 acres is presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural
Resources, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation (“FPR”);

WHEREAS, the 137 acres under the jurisdiction and control of FPR and the 32.3 acres under the jurisdiction of BGS were formerly part of the Vermont State Hospital lands;

WHEREAS, jurisdiction to the 137-acre parcel and other lands, excepting the 32.3-acre parcel and other parcels, was transferred from BGS to FPR by Executive Order #11 of 1973;

WHEREAS, FPR has no further use for the 137-acre parcel and BGS has no further use for the 32.3-acre parcel;

WHEREAS, FPR desires to convey the 137-acre parcel and the 32.3-acre parcel to the Town of Duxbury for use as a Town Forest, and a conservation easement encumbering these parcels to ensure use as a Town Forest in perpetuity to be conveyed to the Duxbury
Land Trust;

WHEREAS, the Town of Duxbury desires to accept such property for use as a Town Forest and the Duxbury Land Trust desires to accept such conservation easement encumbering these parcels to ensure use as a Town Forest in perpetuity; and

WHEREAS, BGS is seeking an amendment to Act 250 Permit #5W1243-1 to remove any requirements or conditions that the 32.3-acre parcel continue to be used by the State as a Camp and to allow the 32.3-acre parcel to be conveyed to the Town of Duxbury for
use as a Town Forest.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter Shumlin, by the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do transfer and set over from BGS to FPR, effective upon the issuance of the Act 250 Permit amendment, for FPR’s purposes, the following
described land and premises being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the former Vermont State Hospital lands located westerly of Vermont State Route 100B and consisting of 32.3 acres and known as the “Father Logue’s Camp” parcel adjacent to 137 acres currently under the jurisdiction and control of FPR. Not
meaning to convey any other lands currently under the jurisdiction and control of BGS located westerly of Vermont State Route 100B, other than the 32.3-acre parcel.

This Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated April 21, 2015

Executive Order No. 29-53
(No. 06-18) [Transfer of Property in the Town of Cambridge from Vermont Agency of Transportation to the Vermont Agency of Natural Resources]

WHEREAS, certain land located in the Town of Cambridge, County of Lamoille, and State of Vermont, as more particularly described herein (“the Property,”) is presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Vermont Agency of Transportation (“VTrans”)
and is no longer necessary for VTrans purposes; and

WHEREAS, the Vermont Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife desires the transfer of the Property to better manage a significant stretch of the Lamoille River and a small developed site that provides access for non-motorized vessels
and shore fishing opportunities, known as the Dorothy Smith Access Area.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Vermont Agency of Transportation to the jurisdiction and control of the Vermont Agency of Natural Resources,
Department of Fish and Wildlife for the aforesaid purpose, the Property being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by the Warranty Deed of Ray C. and Hazel G. Perkins, dated November 5, 1958 and recorded in Book 42, Page 371 of the Town of Cambridge land records and being more particularly described
as follows:

Beginning at a point believed to be in the property line between Ray C. and Hazel G. Perkins and land now or formerly of one M. Hawley, and in the easterly boundary of the present highway, Vermont Route 108, 1/2 rods from its centerline and 24.75 feet
southeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 19+31 of the established center line of Highway Project NRS 151, 1934; thence 880 feet, more or less, northeasterly and northerly in said easterly highway boundary to a point
30 feet easterly at right angle from survey station 28+00 of said established centerline; thence 20 feet, more or less, easterly to a point in the westerly bank of the Lamoille River, so-called, 50 feet easterly at right angle from
survey station 28+00 of said established centerline; thence 1000 feet, more or less, southeasterly and southerly in said westerly river bank to a point believed to be in the property line between the aforesaid Perkins and Hawley, 80
feet southeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 19+31 of said established centerline; thence 58 feet, more or less, northwesterly in said believed property line to the point of beginning.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated August 17, 2018